Washington statutes.
RCW 10.58.010

Rules—Generally.

The rules of evidence in civil actions, so far as practicable, shall be applied to criminal prosecutions.

[Code 1881 s 1071; 1873 p 234 s 233; 1854 p 117 s 97; RRS s 2152.]